Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Subchapter 1. Printing

§ 1101.
Public documents defined.

The words “public documents,” as used in this chapter, shall include the acts and resolves and journals of the General Assembly, the reports of State officers or of any commission, board, or person authorized by law to make reports.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 289

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 1102.
Repealed.
1987, No. 243 (Adj. Sess.), § 41(1), eff. June 13, 1988.

§ 1103.
Printing of reports and bulletins.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, after consultation with the State officers and boards, shall cause to be printed such number of their respective bulletins and reports, in such manner and form, as in his or her judgment the best interests of the State require.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 30

, § 1, eff. March 17, 1961;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a), eff. May 6, 1996.

§ 1104.
Repealed.
1987, No. 243 (Adj. Sess.), § 41(2), eff. June 13, 1988.

§ 1105.
Repealed.
1987, No. 243 (Adj. Sess.), § 41(3), eff. June 13, 1988.

§ 1106.
Contracts for printing.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may make contracts for printing the public documents, Senate and House bills, printing needed by the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House for their respective houses, legislative directories, and such other printing and binding as may be authorized by law or the interests of the State require, excepting contracts for printing court dockets.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 30

, § 1, eff. March 17, 1961;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a), eff. May 6, 1996.

§ 1107.
Bids.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall make contracts for all State printing by advertisement and bid or letters of inquiry, unless otherwise provided.
He or she may reject any and all bids and readvertise or with the approval of the Governor let such contract without further advertisement.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 30

, § 1, eff. March 17, 1961;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a), eff. May 6, 1996.

§ 1108.
Acceptance or rejection of bids; conditions of contracts.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may require satisfactory bonds from bidders and contractors.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 30

, § 1, eff. March 17, 1961;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a), eff. May 6, 1996;

2021, No. 66

, § 6, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 1109.
Repealed.
1987, No. 243 (Adj. Sess.), § 41(4), eff. June 13, 1988.

§ 1110.
Repealed.
1987, No. 243 (Adj. Sess.), § 41(5), eff. June 13, 1988.

§ 1111.
Stationery, forms, and supplies.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall procure and cause to be printed and distributed all office stationery and shall purchase and cause to be distributed all office supplies required by the General Assembly, the several State officers, departments, institutions, boards, and commissions, and such blank complaints, forms, and record books as are necessary.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 30

, § 1, eff. March 17, 1961;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a), eff. May 6, 1996.

§ 1112.
Repealed.
1987, No. 243 (Adj. Sess.), § 41(6), eff. June 13, 1988.

§ 1113.
Journals of the Joint Assembly, Senate, and House of Representatives.

The Secretary of the Joint Assembly, the Secretary of the Senate, and the Clerk of the House of Representatives, within 60 days after the close of each session of the General Assembly, shall furnish a certified copy of the original journals of their respective houses to the printer designated by the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, and within 30 days after the receipt from the printer of the last paged copy shall compile a proper index of the journals of their respective houses and furnish the same to the printer, and shall superintend the publication of their respective journals.
The journal of the Joint Assembly shall be bound with the Journal of the Senate.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 30

, § 1, eff. March 17, 1961;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a), eff. May 6, 1996.

§ 1114.
Repealed. 2021, No. 53, § 8(3).

§ 1115.
Repealed. 2021, No. 53, § 8(4).

§ 1116.
Repealed. 2021, No. 53, § 8(5).

§ 1117.
Repealed.
1987, No. 243 (Adj. Sess.), § 41(7), eff. June 13, 1988.